California statutes. Fish and Game Code
 13200), Subchapter 3 (commencing with Section 13213), Subchapter 4 (commencing with Section 13215), Subchapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 13238), Subchapter 5 (commencing with Section 13240), Subchapter 6 (commencing with Section 13250), and Subchapter 8 (commencing with Section 13255.0) of Chapter 6 of Division 5.5 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 583, Sec. 1.   (AB 3007)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

711.7.

(a) The fish and wildlife resources are held in trust for the people of the state by and through the department.

(1) Insofar as state wildlife trust resources exist and depend upon federal proprietary lands or federal land and water adjacent to or affecting state trust resources, all persons engaging in projects or activities under federal license, contract, or permit, to the extent permitted by federal law, shall be governed by this article and shall pay project filing fees unless the payment of state filing and permit fees is explicitly preempted by the authority of the federal agency permitting the use or modification of state trust resources.

(2) Insofar as state wildlife trust resources exist and depend upon federal proprietary lands or federal lands and waters adjacent to or affecting state trust resources, all federal agencies acting in their proprietary capacity, to the extent permitted by federal law, shall be governed by this article and Sections 10005 and 21089 of the Public Resources Code, unless the payment of state filing and permit fees is explicitly preempted by the authority of a particular federal agency.

(b) If a court of competent jurisdiction finds that any provision of this section or the application thereof to any federal agency, person, or circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the section which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this section are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1706, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

712.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Finance shall include in the Governor’s Budget sufficient moneys from the General Fund and sources other than the Fish and Game Preservation Fund to pay the costs of the department’s nongame programs, including those necessary for the protection and enhancement of California’s nongame fish and wildlife and their habitat, the free hunting and fishing license programs, and special repairs and capital outlay.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Finance shall not include in the Governor’s Budget any appropriation from the Fish and Game Preservation Fund for any program or project which is not expressly found to be an activity relating to the protection or propagation of fish and game, except to the extent that moneys have been deposited in that fund from collections under a law which is not related to the protection or propagation of fish and game.

Any study relating to funding of programs administered or conducted by the department shall include express findings of whether the program is related to the protection or propagation of fish and game and shall describe the relationship.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1706, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

712.1.

(a) (1) The department’s mission is to manage California’s diverse fish, wildlife, and plant resources, and the habitats upon which they depend, for their ecological values and for their use and enjoyment of the public.

(2) The department’s core programs are the following:

(A) Management of departmental lands and facilities.

(B) Biodiversity conservation.

(C) Hunting, fishing, and public use.

(D) Enforcement.

(E) Spill prevention and response.

(F) Communication, education, and outreach.

(3) The department, as a part of a service-based budget review, shall identify strategic goals that reflect the core programs identified in paragraph (2) and support the department’s mission and statutory requirements.

(b) (1) The department shall contract with an independent entity to conduct a comprehensive service-based budget review and to consult on the development of a service-based budget tracking system. The selected contractor shall have experience conducting similar reviews and consulting on similar systems for a comparably sized state agency or department.

(2) The service-based budget review shall study and report on all of the
 following topics:

(A) For each strategic goal identified pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), a definition of the service standards and essential activities required for the department to meet its mission and statutory requirements.

(B) Detailed cost estimates and staffing requirements for meeting the service standards and requirements identified pursuant to subparagraph (A), including applicable administrative costs.

(C) An analysis of how current service levels, activities, expenditures, and staffing levels compare with the service standards and costs identified pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (B), respectively. The analysis shall explicitly identify instances and associated costs where the department is not currently meeting its mission or statutory requirements, as well as where it may be conducting
 activities outside its mission and statutory requirements.

(D) An analysis of the department’s existing revenue structure and program activities supported by those fund sources. The analysis shall identify any instances where the nature of the activity suggests a different funding source, such as user fees or the General Fund, or a different revenue structure that could be allowable or more appropriate to support the activity, or both allowable and more appropriate to support the activity.

(E) The service-based budget review conducted pursuant to this section shall build upon the California Fish and Wildlife Strategic Vision: Recommendations for Enhancing the State’s Fish and Wildlife Management Agencies, issued in April 2012, and the Supporting Healthy Fish and Wildlife Populations in California and Getting People Outdoors: An Expenditure Concept to Invest in Our Natural Heritage
 for All Californians, issued on November 2, 2017.

(3) (A) The service-based budget tracking system shall incorporate data collected for the review pursuant to paragraph (2), including the costs and staffing levels associated with both existing service levels and the service level standards developed pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2).

(B) The service-based budget tracking system shall allow the department to continuously analyze service levels across its programs and the degree to which service standards are being met.

(C) The service-based budget tracking system shall be developed as a tool to inform ongoing and future fiscal decisionmaking processes.

(D) The service-based budget tracking system shall be the property of
 the state even if it is developed using nonstate funding provided pursuant to subdivision (d).

(4) To meet the goals of this subdivision, the department shall collect information necessary to inform service-based budgeting.

(c) In conducting the service-based budget review and developing the service-based budget tracking system pursuant to subdivision (b), the department shall meet all of the following deadlines:

(1) By December 15, 2018, the department shall do all of the following:

(A) Enter into a contract with the independent entity to complete the service-based budget review.

(B) Form an internal leadership team within the department to oversee and manage the service-based budget
 review.

(C) Form an external advisory committee to advise the department and independent entity on conducting the service-based budget review.

(D) Submit a report to the relevant budget and policy committees of the Legislature and the Legislative Analyst’s Office summarizing the status of these activities.

(2) By April 15, 2020, the department shall report in its legislative oversight hearings regarding the status of the service-based budget review.

(3) By January 15, 2021, the department shall submit the final service-based budget review report to the relevant budget and policy committees of the Legislature and the Legislative Analyst’s Office.

(4) By April 15, 2021, the department shall
 report in its legislative oversight hearings how the findings of the service-based budget review have been incorporated into the department’s operations and budget and any changes the department proposed to its operations or budget resulting from the service-based budget review.

(d) (1) The department may enter into one or more agreements to accept funds from any person, nonprofit organization, or other public or private entity for purposes of this section.

(2) Funding provided pursuant to this subdivision may be used by the department for department staff, development of information technology systems, or other costs associated with the service-based budget review and the service-based budget tracking system.

(3) The Department of Finance may authorize expenditure of the funds provided pursuant
 to this subdivision no sooner than 30 days after providing notification of the expenditure to the chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 51, Sec. 1.   (SB 854)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

713.

(a) The changes in the Implicit Price Deflator for State and Local Government Purchases of Goods and Services, as published by the United States Department of Commerce, shall be used as the index to determine an annual rate of increase or decrease in the fees for licenses, stamps, permits, tags, or other entitlements issued by the department.

(b) (1) The department shall determine the change in the Implicit Price Deflator for State and Local Government Purchases of Goods and Services, as published by the United States Department of Commerce, for the quarter ending March 31 of the current year compared to the quarter ending March 31 of the previous year. The
 relative amount of the change shall be multiplied by the current fee for each license, stamp, permit, tag, or other entitlement issued by the department.

(2) The product shall be rounded to the nearest twenty-five cents ($0.25), and the resulting amount shall be added to the fee for the current year. The resulting amount shall be the fee for the license year beginning on or after January 1 of the next succeeding calendar year for the license, stamp, permit, tag, or other entitlement that is adjusted under this section.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department may recalculate the current fees charged for each license, stamp, permit, tag, or other entitlement issued by the department, to determine that all appropriate indexing has been included in the current fees. This section shall apply to all licenses, stamps, permits, tags, or other entitlements, that have
 not been increased each year since the base year of the 1985–86 fiscal year.

(d) The commission, with respect to any license, stamp, permit, tag, or other entitlement issued by the commission shall comply with subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive.

(e) The calculations provided for in this section shall be reported to the Legislature with the Governor’s Budget Bill.

(f) The Legislature finds that all revenues generated by fees for licenses, stamps, permits, tags, and other entitlements, computed under this section and used for the purposes for which they were imposed, are not subject to Article XIII B of the California Constitution.

(g) The department and the commission, at least every five years, shall analyze all fees for licenses, stamps, permits, tags,
 and other entitlements issued by it to ensure the appropriate fee amount is charged. Where appropriate, the department shall recommend to the Legislature or the commission that fees established by the commission or the Legislature be adjusted to ensure that those fees are appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 565, Sec. 3.   (SB 1148)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

715.

(a) The director, in consultation with the Natural Resources Agency, shall establish a formal program, which may be called the Science Institute, to assist the department and commission in obtaining independent scientific review, and recommendations to help inform the scientific work of the department and the commission. The program shall include one or more ad hoc independent scientific committees consisting of independent scientists who are scientific experts in their fields with expertise in biological sciences and with a range of multidisciplinary expertise pertinent to the work of the department and the commission, and which may be convened pursuant to this section. The purpose of the program shall be to assist the department
 and the commission in obtaining and establishing an independent and objective view of the scientific issues underlying important policy decisions.

(b) The objectives of the program shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, the following:

(1) Providing independent scientific guidance of the scientific research, monitoring, and assessment programs that support the department’s and the commission’s work with fish and wildlife species and their habitats.

(2) Providing the best available independent scientific information and advice to guide and inform department and commission decisions.

(3) Promoting and facilitating independent scientific peer review.

(4) Promoting science-based adaptive management.

(5) Ensuring scientific integrity and transparency in decisionmaking.

(c) The department may consult with members of the ad hoc scientific committees to assist the department in identifying other independent scientific experts with specialized expertise as needed for independent peer review of department reports, including, but not limited to, status review reports prepared for purposes of informing decisions on petitions for listing of species under the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3).

(d) The department shall consult with independent scientific advisors
 to develop and revise as necessary a scientific integrity policy to guide the work of the department and the commission. The scientific integrity policy may include, but is not necessarily limited to, an ethical code of conduct for department scientists,
 standards for independent peer review, and other best practices for ensuring scientific integrity and public confidence in department and commission work products and decisions.

(e) For marine fisheries and other marine resources, the department may utilize the California Ocean Science Trust for the purposes of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 559, Sec. 12.   (AB 2402)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.5. Wildlife Violator Compact [716. - 717.2.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [716. - 716.2.]

716.

The Wildlife Violator Compact is hereby enacted into law and entered into with all other participating states.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 398, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Compact effective as prescribed in Section 716.9.)
-------------------------------------------

716.1.

It is the policy of this state in entering into the compact to do all of the following:

(a) Promote compliance with the statutes, ordinances, and administrative rules and regulations relating to the management of wildlife resources in this state.

(b) Recognize the suspension of wildlife license privileges of any person whose license privileges have been suspended by a participating state and treat that suspension as if it had occurred in the licensee’s home state if the violation that resulted in the suspension could have been the basis for suspension in the home state.

(c) Allow a violator, except as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 716.4, to accept a wildlife citation and, without delay or detention, proceed on his or her way whether or not the violator is a resident of the state in which the citation was issued, if the violator’s home state is a party to this compact.

(d) Report to the appropriate participating states, as provided in the compact manual, any conviction recorded against any person whose home state was not the issuing state.

(e) Allow the home state to recognize and treat convictions recorded against its residents, if those convictions occurred in a participating state, as though they had occurred in the home state.

(f) Extend cooperation to its fullest extent among the participating states for enforcing compliance with the terms of a wildlife citation issued in one participating state to a resident of another participating state.

(g) Maximize effective use of law enforcement personnel and information.

(h) Assist court systems in the efficient disposition of wildlife violations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 398, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Compact effective as prescribed in Section 716.9.)
-------------------------------------------

716.2.

The purposes of this chapter include both of the following:

(a) To provide a means by which participating states may join in a reciprocal program to effectuate the policies enumerated in Section 716.1 in a uniform and orderly manner.

(b) To provide for the fair and impartial treatment of wildlife violators operating within participating states in recognition of the violator’s right to due process and the sovereign status of the participating states.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 398, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Compact effective as prescribed in Section 716.9.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [716.3. - 716.3.]

716.3.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Board” means the board of compact administrators established pursuant to Section 716.8.

(b) “Citation” means any summons, complaint, ticket, penalty assessment, or other official document issued to a person by a wildlife officer or other peace officer for a wildlife violation pertaining to sport fishing, hunting, or trapping, which contains an order requiring the person to respond.

(c) “Collateral” means any cash or other security deposited to secure an appearance for trial in connection with
 the issuance by a wildlife officer or other peace officer of a citation for a wildlife violation.

(d) “Compact manual” is a manual used and adopted by the participating states that prescribes the procedures to be followed in administering the wildlife violator compact in participating states.

(e) “Compliance,” with respect to a citation, means the act of answering a citation through an appearance in a court or tribunal, or through the payment of fines, penalties, costs, and surcharges, if any.

(f) “Conviction” means a conviction, including, but not limited to, any court conviction for an offense related to sport fishing, hunting, or trapping, that is prohibited by statute, ordinance, or administrative rule or regulation, that involves the forfeiture of any bail, bond, or other security deposited to secure appearance
 by a person charged with having committed any such offense, the payment of a penalty assessment, a plea of nolo contendere, and the imposition of a deferred or suspended sentence by the court.

(g) “Court” means a court of law, including magistrate’s court and the justice of the peace court.

(h) “Home state” means the state of primary residence of a person.

(i) “Issuing state” means the participating state that issues a wildlife citation to the violator.

(j) “License” means any license, permit, entitlement to use, or other public document that conveys to the person to whom it is issued the privilege of sport fishing, hunting, or trapping, that is regulated by statute, ordinance, or administrative rule or regulation of a participating state.

(k) “Licensing authority,” with reference to this state, means the department, which is the state agency authorized by law to issue or approve licenses or permits to sport fish, hunt, or trap.

(l) “Participating state” means any state that enacts legislation to become a member of the wildlife compact.

(m) “Personal recognizance” means an agreement by a person made at the time of issuance of the wildlife citation that the person will comply with the terms of the citation.

(n) “State” means any state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the Provinces of Canada, and other countries.

(o) “Suspension” means any
 revocation, denial, or withdrawal of any or all license privileges, including the privilege to apply for, purchase, or exercise the benefits conferred by any license for sport fishing, hunting, or trapping.

(p) “Terms of the citation” means those conditions and options expressly stated upon a citation.

(q) “Wildlife” means all species of animals including, but not limited to, mammals, birds, fish, reptiles, amphibians, mollusks, and crustaceans, which are defined as “wildlife” and are protected or otherwise regulated by statute, ordinance, or administrative rule or regulation in a participating state. The species included in the definition of “wildlife” vary from state to state and the determination of whether a species is “wildlife” for the purposes of this compact shall be based on the law of the participating state.

(r) “Wildlife law” means any statute, regulation, ordinance, or administrative rule or regulation developed and enacted for the management of wildlife resources and the uses thereof.

(s) “Wildlife officer” means any individual authorized in this state to issue a citation for a wildlife violation.

(t) “Wildlife violation” means the violation of a statute, ordinance, or administrative rule or regulation developed and enacted for the management of wildlife resources and the uses thereof pertaining to sport fishing, hunting, and trapping and for which a prosecution is initiated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 24.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Compact effective as prescribed in Section 716.9.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Issuing State Violation Procedures [716.4. - 716.4.]

716.4.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when issuing a citation for a wildlife violation for purposes of this chapter, a wildlife officer of the issuing state may issue a citation to any person whose primary residence is in a participating state in the same manner as though the person were a resident of the issuing state, and shall not require that person to post collateral to secure appearance, except as provided in subdivision (b), if the officer receives the personal recognizance of the person that he or she will comply with the terms of the citation.

(b) Personal recognizance is acceptable unless prohibited by ordinance of a city or county, the policy of the issuing agency, a procedure or regulation, or by the compact manual, and only if the violator provides adequate proof of identification to the wildlife officer.

(c) Upon conviction or failure of a person to comply with the terms of a wildlife citation, the appropriate wildlife officer shall report the conviction or failure to comply to the licensing authority of the participating state in which the wildlife citation was issued. The report shall be made in accordance with procedures specified by the issuing state, and shall contain information as prescribed in the compact manual.

(d) Upon receipt of the report of conviction or noncompliance pursuant to subdivision (c), the licensing authority of the issuing state shall transmit to the licensing authority of the home state of the violator the information in the form and content prescribed in the compact manual.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 398, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Compact effective as prescribed in Section 716.9.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Home State Procedures [716.5. - 716.5.]

716.5.

(a) Upon receipt of a report from the licensing authority of the issuing state reporting the failure of a violator to comply with the terms of a citation, the licensing authority shall notify the violator and shall initiate a suspension action. The licensing authority shall suspend the violator’s license privileges, in accordance with the requirements of due process, until satisfactory evidence of compliance with the terms of the wildlife citation has been furnished to the licensing authority.

(b) Upon receipt of a report of conviction from the licensing authority of the issuing state, the licensing authority of the home state may enter that conviction in its records and may treat the conviction as though it occurred in the home state for the purposes of the suspension of license privileges, if the violation that resulted in the conviction would constitute a wildlife violation in the home state.

(c) The licensing authority of the home state shall maintain a record of actions taken and shall make reports to issuing states as provided in the compact manual.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 398, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Compact effective as prescribed in Section 716.9.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Reciprocal Recognition of Suspension [716.6. - 716.6.]

716.6.

(a) As a participating member of the wildlife violator compact, the licensing authority of this state may recognize the suspension of license privileges of any person by any participating state if both of the following occur:

(1) The violation that resulted in the conviction would constitute a wildlife violation in this state.

(2) The conviction that resulted in the suspension could have been the basis for suspension under the statutes, ordinances, or administrative rules or regulations of this state.

(b) The licensing authority shall communicate suspension information to other participating states in the form and content prescribed by the compact manual.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 398, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Compact effective as prescribed in Section 716.9.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Applicability of Other Laws [716.7. - 716.7.]

716.7.

Except as expressly required by this chapter, this chapter shall not be construed to affect the right of any participating state to apply any of its statutes, ordinances, or administrative rules or regulations relating to license privileges to any person or circumstance, or to invalidate or prevent any agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a participating state and a nonparticipating state, concerning wildlife law enforcement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 398, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Compact effective as prescribed in Section 716.9.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Compact Administrator Procedures [716.8. - 716.8.]

716.8.

(a) (1) A board of compact administrators is hereby established to serve as a governing body for the resolution of all matters relating to the operation of this compact. The board shall be composed of one member from each of the participating states to be known as the compact administrator.

(2) A compact administrator of any participating state may provide for the discharge of his or her duties and the performance of his or her functions as a board member by an alternate, designated by that member. An alternate is not entitled to serve unless written notification of his or her identity is provided to the board.

(3) The compact administrator for this state shall be appointed by the director and shall serve, and be subject to removal, in accordance with the laws of this state.

(b) Each member of the board is entitled to one vote. No action of the board shall be binding unless taken at a meeting at which a majority of the membership of the board vote in favor thereof. Action by the board may only be taken at a meeting at which a majority of the membership of the board is present.

(c) The board shall elect annually from its membership a chairperson and vice chairperson.

(d) The board shall adopt bylaws, not inconsistent with this compact, and may amend and rescind the bylaws.

(e) The board may accept for any of its purposes and functions under this compact any donation and grant of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services, conditional or otherwise, from any state, the United States, or any governmental agency, and may receive, utilize, and dispose thereof.

(f) The board may contract with, or accept services or personnel from, any governmental or intergovernmental agency, individual, firm, or corporation, including any private nonprofit organization or institution.

(g) The board shall formulate all necessary procedures and develop uniform forms and documents for administering this compact. All procedures and forms adopted pursuant to board action shall be contained in a compact manual.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 398, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Compact effective as prescribed in Section 716.9.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Entry Into Compact and Withdrawal [716.9. - 716.9.]

716.9.

(a) This chapter shall become effective at such time as it is adopted in substantially similar form by this state and one or more other states, subject to the following conditions:

(1) The entry into the compact shall be made by resolution executed and ratified by authorized officials of the applying state and submitted to the chairperson of the board of contract administrators.

(2) The resolution shall substantially be in the form and content as provided in the compact manual, and shall include all of the following:

(A) A citation of the authority authorizing the state to become a party to this compact.

(B) An agreement to comply with the terms and provisions of this compact.

(C) An agreement that the state entering into the compact agrees to participate with all participating states in the compact.

(b) The effective date of entry into the compact shall be specified by the applying state but shall not be less than 60 days after notice has been given by either the chairperson or secretary of the board to each participating state that the resolution from the applying state has been received.

(c) A participating state may withdraw from participation in this compact by giving written notice to the compact administrator of each participating state. The withdrawal shall not become effective until 90 days from the date on which the written notice of withdrawal is sent to each participating state. The withdrawal of any state shall not affect the validity of this compact as to the remaining participating states.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 398, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.   The Wildlife Violator Compact (as set out in Chapter 1.5, Sections 716 to 717.2) becomes effective as provided in this section.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Amendments to the Compact [717. - 717.]

717.

(a) This compact may be amended periodically. Amendments shall be presented in resolution form to the chairperson of the board, and shall be initiated by one or more participating states.

(b) The adoption of an amendment requires endorsement by all participating states and becomes effective 30 days after the date of the last endorsement.

(c) The failure of any participating state to respond to the appropriate authority within 60 days after receipt of a proposed amendment constitutes endorsement thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 398, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Compact effective as prescribed in Section 716.9.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Construction and Severability [717.1. - 717.2.]

717.1.

This compact shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 398, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Compact effective as prescribed in Section 716.9.)
-------------------------------------------

717.2.

The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid or contrary to the constitution of any participating state or of the United States, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 398, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Compact effective as prescribed in Section 716.9.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Deputies, and Other Employees; County Wardens [850. - 882.]



  ARTICLE 1. State [850. - 860.]

850.

The director shall, from time to time, employ or appoint, with or without pay, such deputies, clerks, assistants, and other employees as the department may need to discharge in proper manner the duties imposed upon it by law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

851.

A deputy appointed to enforce the provisions of this code is a peace officer. The deputy has all the powers and authority conferred by law upon peace officers listed in Section 830.6 of the Penal Code to make arrests for violations of this code, and may serve all processes and notices throughout the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 817, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

853.

(a) The director may deputize any employee of the department to check persons for licenses required under Section 7145 and to enforce any violation of that section.

(b) Before a person is deputized pursuant to this section for the first time, the person shall have satisfactorily completed a training course meeting the minimum standards of, and comparable to, the training for “level III reserve” as set forth in the regulations of the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.

(c) A person, who is deputized for the limited purpose stated in subdivision (a) shall not enforce any other provision of this code. Being
 deputized under this section does not make a person a peace officer subject to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 25.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

854.

Notwithstanding Section 18932 of the Government Code, the minimum age limit for appointment to the position of fish and game warden of the department shall be 18 years. An examination for the position of warden shall require a demonstration of the physical ability to effectively carry out the duties and responsibilities of the position in a manner that would not inordinately endanger the health or safety of a warden or any other person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 26.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

855.

Regularly employed law enforcement officers of the department may, when authorized by the director, expend such sums as authorized for the purchase of fish, birds, or mammals as evidence, or for expenditures related to the procurement of such evidence, or for expenditures made to investigate other violations of this code without divulging the identity of the employee.

The sums so expended shall be repaid to the law enforcement officer making the expenditure upon claims approved by the director. The claims, when approved, shall be paid out of the funds appropriated or made available by law for the support of the
 department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

856.

(a) All employees of the department designated by the director as deputized law enforcement officers are peace officers as provided by Section 830.2 of the Penal Code. The authority of that peace officer extends to any place in the state as to a public offense committed or which offense there is probable cause to believe has been committed within the state.

(b) Every peace officer described in this section, before the date that he or she is first deputized by the department,
 shall have satisfactorily completed the basic course as set forth in the regulations of the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.

(c) Every peace officer described in this section shall be required to complete regular training courses as required by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

856.5.

(a) The department may install patrol vehicle mounted video and audio systems, commonly known as dashboard cameras, in patrol vehicles used by peace officers described in Section 856. A peace officer described in Section 856 may use the patrol vehicle mounted video and audio system to record any communications or other actions involving the officer while the officer is in uniform and acting within the scope of his or her authority.

(b) The department shall adopt a policy to establish
 standards regarding the activation of patrol vehicle mounted video and audio systems and the preservation and retention of recordings from patrol vehicle mounted video and audio
 systems, subject to the following requirements:

(1) Once a patrol vehicle mounted video and audio system has been activated pursuant to standards established by the department pursuant to subdivision (b), the patrol vehicle mounted video and audio system shall record the duration of an encounter.

(2) The department shall retain a recording from a patrol vehicle mounted video and audio system for a minimum of 90 days and a maximum of one year, except if the recording is necessary for a pending, or reasonably foreseeable civil or criminal action, or for training or administrative purposes.

(3) The department shall provide access to a recording from a patrol vehicle mounted video and audio system in accordance with all other provisions of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 629, Sec. 1.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

857.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the status of a person as an employee, agent, or licensee of the department does not confer upon that person a special right or privilege to knowingly enter private land without the consent of the owner, a search warrant, or an inspection warrant.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to employees, agents, or licensees of the department in the event of an emergency. For purposes of this section, “emergency” means a sudden, unexpected occurrence, involving a clear and imminent danger demanding immediate action to prevent or mitigate loss of, or damage to, wildlife, wildlife resources, or wildlife habitat.

(c) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a sworn peace officer authorized pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 830.2 of the Penal Code or, if necessary for law enforcement purposes, to other departmental personnel accompanying a sworn peace officer. Subdivision (a) shall not be construed to define or alter any authority conferred on those peace officers by any other law or court decision.

(d) Subdivision (a) does not apply to, or interfere with, the authority of employees or licensees to enter and inspect land in conformance with Section 4604 of the Public Resources Code.
